test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-F-Ж_А-копейка_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - копейка M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      копейка+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: копе́йка
      копейка+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: копе́йку
      копейка+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: копе́йки
      копейка+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: копе́йке
      копейка+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: копе́йке
      копейка+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: копе́йкой
      копейка+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: копе́йки
      копейка+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Inan: копе́йки
      копейка+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: копе́ек
      копейка+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: копе́йках
      копейка+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: копе́йкам
      копейка+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: копе́йками
